Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [181.771] MICROCHIP IMPLANTATION PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin An employer may not request, require, or coerce an employee to have a microchip implanted in the employee for any reason. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Civil action. new text end new text begin An employee aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. The court may award a prevailing employee injunctive relief, actual damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorney fees and costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise. new text end new text begin (b) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business entity that engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one or more employees, including the state, a state institution, state agency, political subdivisions of the state, and a municipal corporation or quasi-municipal corporation. new text end new text begin (c) "Employee" means an individual who is employed by the employer or who is an applicant for employment with the employer. new text end new text begin (d) "Microchip" means a product, device, or technology that is subcutaneously implanted in the body of an individual and contains a unique identification number and personal information that can be noninvasively retrieved or transmitted with an external scanning device. Microchip does not include a device that is implanted in an individual if the device is used in the diagnosis, monitoring, treatment, or prevention of a health condition and only transmits information as is necessary to carry out the diagnosis, monitoring, treatment, or prevention of the health condition. new text end new text begin (e) "Subcutaneously" means beneath the skin. Subcutaneously does not include information temporarily attached to the skin by an adhesive strip or bracelet upon which or within which personal information is maintained or stored. new text end